District of Columbia statutes.
6-321.08

Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, any reference to the ““Agency” shall be deemed to be a reference to the District of Columbia as the successor in interest to the Agency.

Sept. 8, 1960, 74 Stat. 872, Pub. L. 86-736, § 8
July 9, 2012, 126 Stat. 990, Pub. L. 112-143, § 1(f)
Pub. L. 112-143 rewrote the section, which had read as follows: “As used in this subchapter, the terms ‘Agency,’ ‘lessee,’ ‘real property,’ ‘redevelopment,’ and ‘redevelopment company’ shall have the respective meanings provided for such terms by § 6-301.02.”
1973 Ed., § 5-727.
1981 Ed., § 5-829.